Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB202.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. KRS 383.545 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 61 of this Act:
(1) "Action" means an action for damages, possession, ejectment, quiet title, specific
performance, or other judicial proceeding in which rights under a lease or
Sections 1 to 61 of this Act are determined;
(2) "Actual damages":
(a) Means compensation for direct, consequential, or incidental injuries or
losses; and
(b) Includes amounts payable to a landlord or tenant under the lease for a
violation of the lease and diminution in the value of a dwelling unit;
(3) "Bank":
(a) Means an organization that engages in the business of banking and is
federally insured; and
(b) Includes a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, and
trust company;
(4) "Building, housing, fire, or health code" includes any law concerning fitness for
habitation or the construction, maintenance, operation, occupancy, use, or
appearance of the premises;
(5) "Contact person" means a person designated by a tenant under subsection (2) of
Section 8 of this Act;
(6) "Criminal act" or "criminal activity" means:
(a) The manufacture, sale, distribution, use, or possession of a controlled
substance on or in the vicinity of the premises which is criminal under state
Page 1 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
or federal law; or
(b) Activity that is criminal under state or federal law and threatens the health
or safety of an individual on the premises or the landlord or landlord’s
agent on or off the premises;
(7) "Diminution in the value of a dwelling unit" means a reduction from rent which
reflects the extent to which a noncompliant condition of the premises impairs the
tenant’s use and enjoyment of the unit, as determined by a court based on
evidence that need not include expert testimony;
(8) "Dwelling unit":
(a) Means property leased to a tenant for use as a home, residence, or sleeping
place by an individual or two (2) or more individuals who maintain a
common household, regardless of their relationship to each other; and
(b) Includes:
1. A single family residence, together with fixtures and appurtenances,
the land on which it is located, and any other structure on the land;
and
2. A structure or part of a structure in which the tenant resides, together
with fixtures and appurtenances, and any other area of the land on
which the structure is located to which the tenant is given an exclusive
right of possession during the term of the lease, including a designated
parking space or storage area;
(9) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic,
wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capability;
(10) "Essential service":
(a) Means heat, hot and cold running water, sewage or septic disposal, and
electricity; and
(b) Includes gas or air conditioning if required to be supplied to a tenant by the
Page 2 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
lease, state law, or local ordinance which, if not supplied to the tenant,
would create a serious threat to the health, safety, or property of the tenant
or immediate family member;
(11) "Fees":
(a) Means amounts payable by a tenant to a landlord which the landlord has no
obligation to account for or return to the tenant; and
(b) Does not include rent or a security deposit;
(12) "Funds" means money, checks, bank account credits, certificates of deposit, or
the like;
(13) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable
commercial standards of fair dealing;
(14) "Guest" means an individual, other than the landlord or landlord’s agent, invited
on the premises by a tenant or immediate family member;
(15) "Immediate family member" means any of the following who habitually reside in
a dwelling unit with a tenant:
(a) An individual related to the tenant by blood, adoption, marriage, civil union,
or domestic partnership;
(b) An individual having an intimate relationship with the tenant; or
(c) A foster child, stepchild, or ward of the tenant;
(16) "Landlord" means:
(a) The owner of a dwelling unit rented to a tenant;
(b) A successor in interest to the landlord;
(c) A sublessor, only if the landlord did not consent to the sublease; and
(d) A person that manages the unit or enters a lease on behalf of the owner of
the unit and fails to comply with subsection (3) or (4) of Section 7 of this
Act, except with respect to events occurring after:
1. The tenant is given notice in a record that complies with subsection (3)
Page 3 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
or (4) of Section 7 of this Act; or
2. The date of termination of the person’s authority to act on behalf of
the owner if that authority is terminated;
(17) "Law" includes federal or state statutes, case law, administrative action, and
legislative acts of local governments;
(18) "Lease":
(a) Means a contract, oral or in a record, between a landlord and tenant in
which the landlord rents a dwelling unit to the tenant for a tenancy for a
fixed term or a periodic tenancy; and
(b) Includes an amendment to the lease, rules adopted by the landlord which
were disclosed to the tenant under subsection (2)(d) of Section 7 of this Act,
and, subject to Section 18 of this Act, rules adopted by the landlord after
commencement of the term of the lease;
(19) "Notice in a record" means notice that complies with subsection (2) of Section 6
of this Act;
(20) "Owner" means a person vested with all or part of:
(a) Legal title to the premises; or
(b) Beneficial ownership and a right to present use and enjoyment of the
premises;
(21) "Periodic rent" means the amount payable each month under a tenancy for a
fixed term or a periodic tenancy for month-to-month or payable each week under
a periodic tenancy for week-to-week. If rent is payable annually, periodic rent is
the amount of the annual rent divided by twelve (12);
(22) "Periodic tenancy" means a tenancy created under a lease or arising by
operation of law for either month-to-month or week-to-week;
(23) "Person" means an individual, estate, trust, business or nonprofit entity, public
corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
Page 4 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
instrumentality, or other legal entity;
(24) "Premises":
(a) Means a dwelling unit and, to the extent owned by the landlord, any
structure of which the unit is a part; and
(b) Includes any area and structure owned by the landlord which is associated
with the structure in which the dwelling unit is located and held out by the
landlord for the use of tenants generally;
(25) "Prepaid rent" means rent paid to a landlord before the first day of the rental
period to which it is to be applied;
(26) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is
stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;
(27) "Rent":
(a) Used as a noun, means a payment for the right to possession of a dwelling
unit; and
(b) Does not include a security deposit or fees;
(28) "Repairs" includes remediations;
(29) "Security deposit":
(a) Means funds provided to a landlord to secure payment or performance of a
tenant’s obligations under a lease or Sections 1 to 61 of this Act and the
identifiable proceeds of the funds, however denominated; and
(b) Does not include rent or fees;
(30) "Security interest" means an interest in personal property which secures
payment or performance of a tenant’s obligations under a lease or Sections 1 to
61 of this Act;
(31) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol,
Page 5 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
sound, or process.
As used in this subsection, "symbol" includes an email address or other
identifying header;
(32) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico,
the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to
the jurisdiction of the United States;
(33) "Tenancy for a fixed term" means a tenancy under a lease for a fixed or
computable period, regardless of the length of the period;
(34) "Tenant" means:
(a) A person that is a party to a lease of a dwelling unit and is entitled to
possession of the unit;
(b) An assignee or sublessee of a person described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection which has possession of the unit with the landlord’s consent;
and
(c) An individual authorized to occupy the unit by a person described in
paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection that is not an individual;
(35) "Tenant representative" means:
(a) A personal representative of a deceased tenant’s estate; or
(b) Before the appointment of a personal representative, a contact person, or in
the absence of a contact person, a person the landlord reasonably believes
to be an heir of the tenant under the applicable intestate succession law;
(36) "Unearned rent":
(a) Means rent, including prepaid rent, that a tenant paid to a landlord for the
right to possession of the dwelling unit for any period after the date the
lease terminates in accordance with its terms or Sections 1 to 61 of this Act;
and
(b) Does not include an amount, including rent, owed to the landlord for a
Page 6 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
period before or after the date the lease terminates during which the tenant
is in physical possession of the premises; and
(37) "Willful" or "willfully" means the intentional performance of an act the actor
knows to be prohibited by Sections 1 to 61 of this Act or a lease, intentional
failure to perform an act the actor knows to be required by Sections 1 to 61 of this
Act or the lease, or deliberate indifference to whether the performance or failure
to perform violates Sections 1 to 61 of this Act or the lease.
SECTION 2. KRS 383.535 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Occupancy as a vacation rental" means occupancy that has the following
characteristics:
1. The tenant rents the dwelling unit for vacation purposes only and has
a principal residence other than the unit;
2. The unit is furnished with personal property necessary to make the
unit ready for immediate occupancy by the tenant; and
3. The occupancy does not exceed thirty (30) consecutive days; and
(b) "Transient occupancy" means occupancy in a room or suite of rooms
which has the following characteristics:
1. The cost of occupancy is charged on a daily basis;
2. The operator of the room or suite provides housekeeping and linen
service as part of the regularly charged cost of occupancy; and
3. The occupancy does not exceed thirty (30) consecutive days.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, Sections 1 to 61 of
this Act apply to a lease of a dwelling unit in this Commonwealth.
(3) The following arrangements are not governed by Sections 1 to 61 of this Act:
(a) Residence at a public or private facility, if incidental to detention or the
Page 7 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
provision of medical, mental health, geriatric, counseling, educational,
religious, disability, personal safety, or similar service;
(b) Occupancy under a contract of sale of, or an option to purchase, a dwelling
unit or the building of which it is a part, if the occupant is the purchaser or
optionee or an individual who has succeeded to the interest of the purchaser
or optionee;
(c) Occupancy by a member of a fraternal or social organization in a part of a
structure operated for the benefit of the organization;
(d) Transient occupancy;
(e) Occupancy by an employee of a landlord when the employee’s right to
occupancy is conditioned on employment in or about the premises;
(f) Occupancy by a holder of a proprietary lease in a cooperative;
(g) Occupancy under a lease covering premises used by the occupant for
agricultural purposes;
(h) Occupancy as a vacation rental; and
(i) A ground lease of real property which lease does not include a dwelling
unit.
SECTION 3. KRS 383.520 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A right or obligation under Sections 1 to 61 of this Act is enforceable by an action
unless the provision creating the right or obligation provides otherwise.
(2) A party seeking relief under Sections 1 to 61 of this Act has a duty to mitigate
damages.
SECTION 4. KRS 383.550 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Every lease or duty under Sections 1 to 61 of this Act imposes an obligation of good
faith in its performance and enforcement.
Page 8 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
SECTION 5. KRS 383.555 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a court, as a matter of law, finds a lease or any provision of the lease was
unconscionable at the time it was made, the court may refuse to enforce the lease,
enforce the remainder of the lease without the unconscionable provision, or limit
application of the unconscionable provision to avoid an unconscionable result.
(2) If a court, as a matter of law, finds a settlement agreement in which a party
waived or agreed to forgo a claim or right under a lease or Sections 1 to 61 of this
Act was unconscionable at the time it was made, the court may refuse to enforce
the agreement, enforce the remainder of the agreement without the
unconscionable provision, or limit application of the unconscionable provision to
avoid an unconscionable result.
(3) If a party or the court puts unconscionability in issue under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section, the court shall allow the parties to present evidence of the setting,
purpose, and effect of the lease or settlement agreement to aid the court in
making the determination of unconscionability.
SECTION 6. KRS 383.560 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, a person has notice of a fact if the person:
(a) Has actual knowledge of the fact;
(b) Received notice of the fact under subsection (4) of this section; or
(c) Has reason to know the fact exists from all facts known to the person at the
time in question.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of Section 44 of this Act, if
Sections 1 to 61 of this Act require notice in a record, the notice must be signed
by the person giving it and:
(a) Delivered personally to the recipient;
Page 9 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(b) Deposited in the mail with proper postage and properly addressed if:
1. Sent to the landlord, to the mailing address specified under Section 7
of this Act;
2. Sent to the tenant, to the mailing address specified under Section 8 of
this Act; or
3. Sent to a person other than a landlord or tenant, or if there is no
address specified for the landlord or tenant, to an address reasonable
under the circumstances; or
(c) Unless the landlord or tenant notifies the other at any time that notice shall
be given only by personal delivery or by mail as provided in paragraph (b) of
this subsection, delivered by another means of communication with cost of
transmission provided for and properly addressed if:
1. Sent to the landlord, to an address specified under Section 7 of this
Act;
2. Sent to the tenant, to an address specified under Section 8 of this Act;
or
3. No address is specified, to an address reasonable under the
circumstances.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person gives
notice of a fact to another person by taking steps reasonably calculated to inform
the other person, whether or not the other person learns of the fact.
(4) In Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, a person receives notice of a fact when:
(a) The fact comes to the person’s attention; or
(b) If notice in a record is required, the notice is:
1. Personally delivered under subsection (2)(a) of this section; or
2. Sent or delivered under subsection (2)(b) or (c) of this section.
SECTION 7. KRS 383.585 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
Page 10 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Before accepting an application fee, the prospective landlord shall disclose to the
prospective tenant in a record the criteria the landlord uses to determine the
landlord’s willingness to enter into a lease with a tenant.
(2) Before accepting funds to be applied to a security deposit, prepaid rent, or fees
other than an application fee, or before entering into a lease, a prospective
landlord shall disclose to the prospective tenant in a record the following:
(a) Any condition of the premises which the landlord knows, or on a reasonable
inspection of the premises should have known, would constitute a
noncompliance under Section 16 of this Act and would materially interfere
with the health or safety of the tenant or immediate family member or would
materially interfere with the use and enjoyment of the premises by the
tenant or immediate family member;
(b) Whether, to the knowledge of the landlord, a foreclosure action or
extrajudicial foreclosure proceeding has been commenced against the
premises;
(c) If rent is prepaid, the month or other period of the lease to which the rent is
to be applied; and
(d) The rules affecting the tenant’s use and enjoyment of the premises, whether
adopted by the landlord or another person.
(3) At or before commencement of the term of a lease, the landlord shall give the
tenant notice in a record specifying:
(a) The name of:
1. The landlord;
2. Any person authorized to manage the premises;
3. The owner of the premises;
4. Any person authorized to act for the owner for service of process; and
Page 11 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
5. Any person authorized to receive a notice or demand for the owner;
(b) The mailing address and any address to be used for the receipt of electronic
communications by the landlord or any person designated by the landlord to
which a notice or demand must be sent; and
(c) The address to, or the method by, which the tenant must deliver rent.
(4) A landlord shall keep current the information required by subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) If the premises were in foreclosure before a landlord and tenant entered into a
lease and the disclosure required by subsection (2)(b) of this section was not
made, the tenant may recover actual damages resulting from the foreclosure.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) At or before commencement of the term of a lease, the tenant shall give the
landlord notice in a record specifying the tenant’s mailing address and any
address to be used for the receipt of electronic communications by the tenant.
(2) At the request of a landlord, the tenant shall designate a contact person to act for
the tenant on the tenant’s death, by giving the landlord a record specifying the
name and, if known, the mailing address, any address to be used for the receipt of
electronic communications, and the telephone number of the contact person. In
the absence of a request by the landlord, the tenant may designate a contact
person in the same manner.
(3) A tenant shall keep current the information required by subsections (1) and (2) of
this section. On termination of the lease, the tenant shall provide the landlord a
forwarding address to which the landlord must send the tenant’s security deposit
and unearned rent or other communications.
SECTION 9. KRS 383.510 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 12 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
Unless displaced by the particular provisions of Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, the
principles of law and equity supplement Sections 1 to 61 of this Act.
SECTION 10. KRS 383.565 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A lease may include terms and conditions not prohibited by Sections 1 to 61 of
this Act or other law.
(2) Unless a lease or law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act otherwise provides:
(a) The tenant shall pay rent for the dwelling unit for the term of the lease in
an amount comparable to the rent paid for other dwelling units of similar
size and condition in the same or a comparable location, determined at the
commencement of the term;
(b) Rent is:
1. Payable without demand or notice:
a. At the address or place the landlord designates under subsection
(3)(c) of Section 7 of this Act or, if no designation is made, at the
landlord’s place of business at the time the lease was made; and
b. On the first day of each month or at the beginning of the term if
the term is less than one (1) month; and
2. Uniformly apportioned from day to day; and
(c) A rental period is on a monthly basis beginning with the first day of the
month for a tenancy for a fixed term of more than one (1) month or a
periodic tenancy of month-to-month and, for all other tenancies, the rental
period begins on the first day rent is paid.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in Section 11 of this Act, unless the lease creates a
tenancy for a fixed term, the tenancy is a periodic tenancy for week-to-week if the
tenant pays rent weekly and otherwise is a periodic tenancy for month-to-month.
(4) A landlord shall provide the tenant a copy of any lease that is signed by them or,
Page 13 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
if the lease is enforceable under Section 11 of this Act, signed by either of them.
(5) If a landlord willfully fails to comply with subsection (4) of this section, the
tenant may recover actual damages or one (1) month’s periodic rent, whichever is
greater.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section:
(a) If a lease signed by the tenant is delivered to the landlord and the landlord
fails to sign the lease and return it to the tenant, acceptance of rent by the
landlord without a reservation of rights gives the lease the same effect as if
the lease had been signed by the landlord and returned to the tenant; and
(b) If a lease signed by the landlord is delivered to the tenant and the tenant
fails to sign the lease and return it to the landlord, acceptance of possession
and payment of rent without a reservation of rights gives the lease the same
effect as if the lease had been signed by the tenant and returned to the
landlord.
(2) If a lease given effect under subsection (1) of this section provides for a tenancy
for a fixed term longer than one (1) year, the lease is effective for one (1) year.
(3) Absent a lease signed by the landlord or tenant which is delivered to the other, if
the tenant accepts possession and pays rent to the landlord without a reservation
of rights and the landlord accepts rent from the tenant without a reservation of
rights, the tenancy created is a periodic tenancy for week-to-week if the tenant
pays rent weekly and in all other cases a periodic tenancy for month-to-month.
SECTION 12. KRS 383.570 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A lease shall not require the tenant to:
(a) Unless permitted by Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, waive or forgo a right or
Page 14 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
remedy under Sections 1 to 61 of this Act;
(b) Authorize a person to confess judgment on a claim arising out of the lease
or Sections 1 to 61 of this Act;
(c) Perform a duty imposed on the landlord by Section 16 of this Act;
(d) Agree to pay attorney’s fees and costs of the landlord other than those
provided by Sections 1 to 61 of this Act or law other than Sections 1 to 61 of
this Act; or
(e) Agree to exculpate or limit a liability of the landlord arising under Sections
1 to 61 of this Act or law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act or indemnify
the landlord for the liability and the costs connected with the liability.
(2) A provision in a lease prohibited by subsection (1) of this section or law other
than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act is unenforceable. If the landlord seeks to enforce
the provision or accepts the tenant’s voluntary compliance with the provision, the
court may award the tenant an amount not to exceed three (3) times the periodic
rent.
SECTION 13. KRS 383.575 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A lease, assignment, sublease, conveyance, trust deed, or security instrument shall not
authorize a person to receive rent without assuming the duties imposed on the landlord
by the lease and Section 16 of this Act.
SECTION 14. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "prevailing party" means a party that:
(a) Initiated the enforcement of a right or remedy under a lease or Sections 1 to
61 of this Act and substantially prevailed on the right or remedy asserted; or
(b) Substantially prevailed in defending against a right or remedy asserted by
the other party.
Page 15 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(2) In an action to enforce a right or remedy arising under a lease or Sections 1 to 61
of this Act, the court shall award the prevailing party costs. The court may award
the prevailing party reasonable attorney’s fees if the court determines that the
other party did not act in good faith, willfully performed an act prohibited by the
lease or Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, or willfully refrained from performing an act
required by the lease or Sections 1 to 61 of this Act.
(3) A court shall not award a landlord attorney’s fees or costs in an uncontested
action to recover possession of a dwelling unit.
SECTION 15. KRS 383.590 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A landlord shall deliver physical possession of the dwelling unit to the tenant at the
commencement of the term of the lease.
SECTION 16. KRS 383.595 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A landlord has a nonwaivable duty to maintain the premises in a habitable
condition, including making necessary repairs. The duty requires the landlord to
ensure that the premises:
(a) Comply with all obligations imposed on the landlord by any applicable
building, housing, fire, or health code or law other than Sections 1 to 61 of
this Act;
(b) Have effective waterproofing and weather protection of the roof and
exterior walls, including windows and doors;
(c) Have plumbing facilities that conform to law and are maintained in good
working order;
(d) Have access to a water supply approved under law which can provide hot
and cold running water;
(e) Have adequate ventilation and heating facilities that conform to law and are
Page 16 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
maintained in good working order;
(f) Have electrical lighting, with wiring and equipment that conform to law and
are maintained in good working order;
(g) Have reasonable measures in place to control the presence of rodents,
bedbugs, and other vermin and to prevent exposure to unsafe levels of
radon, lead paint, asbestos, toxic mold, and other hazardous substances;
(h) To the extent the premises include a common area or other areas under the
landlord’s control, have reasonable measures in place to make the area:
1. Clean and sanitary;
2. Safe for normal and reasonably foreseeable use consistent with the
lease and in good repair; and
3. Reasonably free of debris, filth, rubbish, garbage, and the items listed
in paragraph (g) of this subsection;
(i) Have an adequate number of appropriate receptacles in reasonably clean
condition if the landlord is obligated to provide trash removal or recycling
service by law or an agreement in a record signed by the landlord and
tenant;
(j) Have in good repair floors, doors, windows, walls, ceilings, stairways, and
railings;
(k) Have in good repair other facilities and appliances supplied or required to
be supplied by the landlord;
(l) Have in good repair locks or other security devices on all exterior doors and
on windows that open and close, including those of the dwelling unit and
other parts of the premises; and
(m) Have in good working order any safety equipment required by law.
(2) A landlord has the duty to ensure the premises have access to essential services,
but the lease may require an account with a utility provider of an essential service
Page 17 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
to the dwelling unit be in the name of the tenant and the tenant pay the periodic
cost for the service. If the service is not provided because the tenant fails to pay
for the service, the landlord does not fail to comply with this subsection.
(3) If a sublessor is a landlord for purposes of Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, the
sublessor has the duty to comply with subsection (1) of this section except for
duties that would require the sublessor to access parts of the premises beyond the
sublessor’s control.
(4) A landlord and tenant may agree that the tenant is to perform specified repairs,
maintenance tasks, alterations, or remodeling only if:
(a) The agreement is in a record, other than the lease, signed by the parties and
supported by adequate consideration;
(b) The work is not necessary to cure the landlord’s noncompliance with
subsection (1)(a) of this section; and
(c) The agreement does not affect the obligation of the landlord to other
tenants on the premises.
(5) A landlord shall not treat performance of an agreement described in subsection
(4) of this section as a condition to the performance of any obligation under the
lease or this section.
SECTION 17. KRS 383.600 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Except to the extent a landlord and tenant otherwise agree in a signed record, if the
landlord, in a good-faith sale to a bona fide purchaser, conveys premises that include a
dwelling unit subject to a lease, the following rules apply:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the landlord is
relieved of liability under the lease and Sections 1 to 61 of this Act as to an event
that occurs after the later of the conveyance to the purchaser or notice in a record
by the landlord to the tenant of the conveyance; and
Page 18 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(2) Except as otherwise provided in Section 60 of this Act, the landlord remains
liable to the tenant for the amount of any security deposit and unearned rent.
SECTION 18. KRS 383.610 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1) of Section 19 of this Act or as
required by law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, a landlord may enforce a
rule of the landlord in existence at the time the lease commenced only if the rule
was disclosed to the tenant under Section 7 of this Act.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, after
commencement of the term of a lease, the landlord may adopt or modify a rule
concerning the tenant’s use and enjoyment of the premises, but the rule or
modification shall not take effect earlier than thirty (30) days after the landlord
gives the tenant notice in a record of the rule or modification.
(3) In a periodic tenancy for month-to-month, a rule or modification adopted under
subsection (2) of this section shall not take effect before the expiration of the
period in subsection (2)(b) of Section 37 of this Act during which the tenant or
landlord could have exercised the right to terminate the tenancy.
(4) In a tenancy for a fixed term, if a rule or modification adopted under subsection
(2) of this section substantially modifies the tenant’s benefit of the bargain and is
not required by law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, the rule is not
enforceable against the tenant unless the tenant consents in a signed record.
SECTION 19. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Before the commencement of the term of a lease, if the landlord fails to disclose a
rule adopted by a person other than the landlord which substantially modifies the
tenant’s benefit of the bargain and is not required by law other than Sections 1 to
61 of this Act, and the rule is enforced against the tenant, the tenant may:
Page 19 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(a) Recover actual damages from the landlord; or
(b) Terminate the lease by giving the landlord notice in a record that the lease
will terminate on a date specified in the notice which must be at least (30)
days after the notice is given.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, if, after the
commencement of the term of a lease, a person other than the landlord adopts or
modifies a rule that substantially modifies the tenant’s benefit of the bargain and
is not required by law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act and the rule is
enforced against the tenant, the tenant of a tenancy for a fixed term may
terminate the lease by giving the landlord notice in a record that the lease will
terminate on a date specified in the notice which must be at least thirty (30) days
after the notice is given or, in the case of a periodic tenancy, terminate the
tenancy in accordance with Section 37 of this Act.
(3) A tenant shall not terminate a lease under subsection (2) of this section if the
lease provides the dwelling unit is subject to rules of a person other than the
landlord and the person may modify the rules after the commencement of the
term of the lease.
SECTION 20. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Except as otherwise provided in Section 22 of this Act, if a landlord fails to comply with
the lease or Section 16 of this Act, the tenant has the remedies under Section 21 of this
Act if the tenant gives the landlord:
(1) Notice in a record of the noncompliance; and
(2) An opportunity to remedy the noncompliance within the following periods:
(a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this section, not later than fourteen (14) days
after the tenant gave the notice; and
(b) If the noncompliance involves failure to provide an essential service or
Page 20 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
materially interferes with the health or safety of the tenant or immediate
family member, the landlord shall remedy the noncompliance as soon as
practicable but not later than five (5) days after the tenant gave the notice.
SECTION 21. KRS 383.625 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in Section 22 of this Act, if a landlord’s noncompliance with
the lease or Section 16 of this Act results in the tenant not receiving an essential
service, materially interferes with the health or safety of the tenant or immediate
family member, or materially interferes with the use and enjoyment of the
premises by the tenant or immediate family member and the noncompliance is
not remedied during the applicable period specified in Section 20 of this Act, the
tenant may:
(a) Terminate the lease as provided in Section 23 of this Act; or
(b) Continue the lease and elect one (1) or more of the following remedies:
1. Subject to Section 27 of this Act, withhold rent for the period of
noncompliance beginning on the date the tenant gave notice under
Section 20 of this Act;
2. Recover actual damages;
3. Obtain injunctive relief, specific performance, or other equitable
relief;
4. Make repairs and deduct the cost from the rent, as provided in Section
25 of this Act; or
5. Secure an essential service the landlord is obligated to provide or
comparable substitute housing during the period of noncompliance as
provided in Section 26 of this Act.
(2) If a landlord’s noncompliance with the lease or Section 16 of this Act does not
materially interfere with the health or safety of the tenant or immediate family
Page 21 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
member or the use and enjoyment of the premises by the tenant or immediate
family member, the tenant may elect one (1) or more of the remedies provided in
subsection (1)(b)2., 3., or 4. of this section.
(3) A tenant is not entitled to a remedy under this section to the extent:
(a) The landlord’s noncompliance was caused by an act or omission of the
tenant, immediate family member, or guest; or
(b) The tenant, immediate family member, or guest prevented the landlord from
having access to the dwelling unit to remedy the act or omission described
in the notice under Section 20 of this Act.
SECTION 22. KRS 383.650 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a dwelling unit or other part of the premises is substantially damaged or
destroyed by a fire, other casualty, or natural disaster and:
(a) The unit or other part of the premises is uninhabitable or inaccessible or
continued occupancy of the unit is unlawful, the tenant may vacate the unit
immediately and, not later than fourteen (14) days after vacating the unit,
give the landlord notice in a record of the tenant's intent to terminate the
lease, in which case the lease terminates as of the date the tenant vacates
the unit; or
(b) If continued occupancy of the unit is lawful, subject to the landlord’s right
to terminate the lease under subsection (2) of this section, the tenant, after
complying with Section 20 of this Act, may continue the lease and seek the
remedies provided in subsection (1)(b)1., 2., 3., or 4. of Section 21 of this
Act.
(2) If a dwelling unit or other part of the premises is substantially damaged by a fire,
other casualty, or natural disaster and continued occupancy of the unit is
unlawful or dangerous or requires repairs that can be made only if the tenant
Page 22 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
vacates the unit, the landlord may terminate the lease by giving the tenant notice
in a record that the lease will terminate on a specified date, which must be at least
five (5) days after the notice is given.
(3) If a landlord's noncompliance with the lease or Section 16 of this Act materially
interferes with the health or safety of a tenant or immediate family member or the
use and enjoyment of the premises by the tenant or immediate family member and
it is impossible for the landlord to remedy the noncompliance within the
applicable period specified in Section 20 of this Act, the tenant may terminate the
lease as provided in subsection (2) of Section 23 of this Act or, subject to
subsection (4) of this section, continue the lease and recover actual damages
limited to diminution in the value of the dwelling unit.
(4) If a landlord's noncompliance with the lease or Section 16 of this Act materially
interferes with the health or safety of a tenant or immediate family member or the
use and enjoyment of the premises by the tenant or immediate family member and
it is impossible for the landlord to remedy the noncompliance not later than (30)
days after receiving the notice under Section 20 of this Act, the landlord may
terminate the lease by giving the tenant notice in a record that the lease will
terminate on a specified date, which must be at least thirty (30) days after the
landlord gives the notice. The landlord shall not rent the unit for ninety (90) days
after termination of the lease.
(5) If a lease is terminated under this section, the landlord shall return any security
deposit and unearned rent to which the tenant is entitled under Section 59 of this
Act.
(6) This section does not preclude a:
(a) Landlord from seeking actual damages from the tenant under law other
than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act for damage to the premises caused by an
act or omission of the tenant, immediate family member, or guest; or
Page 23 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(b) Tenant from seeking actual damages from the landlord under law other
than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act if the fire or other casualty was caused by
an act or omission of the landlord or landlord’s agent.
SECTION 23. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a landlord’s noncompliance with the lease or Section 16 of this Act materially
interferes with the health or safety of the tenant or immediate family member and
the noncompliance is not remedied within the period specified in subsection
(2)(b) of Section 20 of this Act, the tenant may terminate the lease by giving the
landlord notice in a record of the tenant’s intent to terminate the lease
immediately or on a specified date, which is not later than thirty (30) days after
the date of the notice.
(2) If a landlord’s noncompliance with the lease or Section 16 of this Act materially
interferes with the use and enjoyment of the premises unrelated to the health or
safety of the tenant or immediate family member and the noncompliance is not
remedied within the period specified in subsection (2)(a) of Section 20 of this Act,
the tenant may terminate the lease by giving the landlord notice in a record of the
tenant’s intent to terminate the lease on a specified date, which must be at least
fourteen (14) days after the expiration of the period allowed under Section 20 of
this Act for the remedy of the noncompliance.
(3) In addition to terminating a lease as provided in subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the tenant may recover actual damages.
(4) If a tenant terminates a lease under this section, the landlord shall return any
security deposit and unearned rent to which the tenant is entitled under Section
59 of this Act.
SECTION 24. KRS 383.630 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 24 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, if a landlord does
not deliver physical possession of the dwelling unit to the tenant under Section 15
of this Act, the tenant is not required to pay rent until possession is delivered and
may:
(a) Terminate the lease by giving notice in a record to the landlord at any time
before the landlord delivers possession of the unit to the tenant; or
(b) Demand performance of the lease by the landlord and:
1. Recover actual damages and obtain possession of the unit from the
landlord; or
2. Obtain possession of the unit from any person wrongfully in
possession by any lawful means the landlord could have used.
(2) If a tenant terminates the lease under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the
landlord shall return any amounts received from the tenant before the
commencement of the term of the lease.
(3) In addition to the rights of a tenant under subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
if a landlord’s failure to deliver possession to the tenant under Section 15 of this
Act is willful, the tenant may recover three (3) times the periodic rent or three (3)
times the actual damages, whichever is greater.
(4) If a tenant seeks possession under subsection (1)(b)2. of this section, the tenant is
liable to the landlord for rent and may recover from the person wrongfully in
possession the damages provided in Section 38 of this Act.
SECTION 25. KRS 383.635 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, if a landlord fails to comply with the
lease or Section 16 of this Act, the tenant may give notice to the landlord under
Section 20 of this Act specifying the noncompliance. If the landlord fails to
remedy the noncompliance within the applicable period specified in Section 20 of
Page 25 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
this Act and the reasonable cost to remedy the noncompliance does not exceed
one (1) month’s periodic rent, the tenant may make repairs to remedy the
noncompliance at the landlord’s expense.
(2) A tenant that makes repairs under subsection (1) of this section is entitled to
recover the actual and reasonable cost incurred or the reasonable value of the
work performed to remedy the noncompliance, not exceeding one (1) month’s
periodic rent. Unless the tenant has been reimbursed by the landlord, the tenant
may deduct the cost or value from rent after submitting to the landlord an
itemized statement, accompanied by receipts for purchased items and services.
(3) A repair under subsection (1) of this section must be made in a professional
manner and in compliance with applicable law.
(4) A tenant shall not repair a noncompliance at the landlord’s expense under
subsection (1) of this section to the extent the:
(a) Noncompliance was caused by an act or omission of the tenant, immediate
family member, or guest; or
(b) Landlord was unable to remedy the noncompliance within the applicable
period specified in Section 20 of this Act because the tenant, immediate
family member, or guest denied the landlord access to the dwelling unit.
(5) A tenant’s use of the remedy under this section is limited to one (1) month’s
periodic rent during any twelve (12) month period.
SECTION 26. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in Section 22 of this Act, if a tenant fails to receive
an essential service the landlord has a duty to provide under subsection (2) of
Section 16 of this Act, the tenant may give notice to the landlord under Section 20
of this Act specifying the failure. If the landlord fails to provide the essential
service within the applicable period specified in Section 20 of this Act, the tenant
Page 26 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
may:
(a) Take appropriate measures to secure the essential service during the period
of the landlord’s noncompliance and deduct the actual and reasonable cost
from the rent; or
(b) Procure comparable substitute housing at the landlord’s expense during the
period of the noncompliance and recover actual damages.
(2) This section does not apply if the tenant’s failure to receive the essential service
was caused by an act or omission of the tenant, immediate family member, or
guest.
SECTION 27. KRS 383.645 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a landlord fails to comply with the lease or Section 16 of this Act and the tenant
has complied with Section 20 of this Act, the tenant may defend an action by the
landlord based on nonpayment of rent on the ground that no rent was due
because of the noncompliance and counterclaim for any amount the tenant may
recover under the lease or Sections 1 to 61 of this Act.
(2) If a tenant is in possession of the dwelling unit when the landlord files an action
based on nonpayment of rent, either party may seek a court order directing the
tenant to pay all or part of the unpaid rent and all additional rent as it accrues
into an escrow account with the court or a bank or other entity authorized by the
court to hold funds in escrow.
(3) If rent has been paid into escrow under this section and the court determines the
landlord fully complied with the lease and Section 16 of this Act, the court shall
order the immediate release to the landlord of rent held in escrow and enter
judgment for any remaining rent owed.
(4) If rent has been paid into escrow under this section and the court determines that
the landlord’s noncompliance with the lease or Section 16 of this Act materially
Page 27 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
interferes with the health or safety of a tenant or an immediate family member or
the use and enjoyment of the premises by the tenant or an immediate family
member, the court may order one (1) or more of the following:
(a) Release to the landlord of all or part of the rent held in escrow to be used
only to bring the premises into compliance with the lease or Section 16 of
this Act;
(b) Return to the tenant of all or part of the rent held in escrow in
compensation for:
1. A repair made by the tenant in compliance with Section 25 of this Act;
or
2. Actual damages;
(c) The tenant’s continued payment of rent into escrow as rent becomes due or
abatement of future rent until the landlord brings the premises into
compliance with the lease or Section 16 of this Act; and
(d) Payment to the landlord of any rent held in escrow not otherwise payable to
the tenant.
(5) If rent has not been paid into escrow under this section and the court determines
that the landlord complied with the lease and Section 16 of this Act, the court
shall render judgment for unpaid rent.
(6) If rent has not been paid into escrow under this section and the court determines
that the landlord’s noncompliance with the lease or Section 16 of this Act
materially interferes with the health or safety of a tenant or immediate family
member or the use and enjoyment of the premises by the tenant or an immediate
family member, the court shall render judgment for unpaid rent less any amount
expended by the tenant in compliance with Section 25 of this Act to repair the
premises and actual damages.
(7) In addition to the other remedies provided in this section, the court may award
Page 28 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
possession or other appropriate relief if the court determines the tenant:
(a) Acted in bad faith in withholding rent; or
(b) Failed to comply with an order to pay rent into escrow under subsection (2)
of this section or to pay rent or other amounts owed to the landlord under
this section.
(8) The court shall not award possession if the court determines that the tenant
withheld rent in good faith and the tenant complies with an order to pay unpaid
rent into escrow or to the landlord under this section.
SECTION 28. KRS 383.655 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a landlord unlawfully removes or excludes the tenant from the premises or
willfully interrupts or causes the interruption of an essential service the landlord
has the duty to provide to the tenant, the tenant may recover three (3) times the
periodic rent or three (3) times the damages, whichever is greater, and:
(a) Recover possession; or
(b) Terminate the lease by giving the landlord notice in a record of the tenant’s
intent to terminate the lease immediately or on a later specified date.
(2) If a tenant terminates the lease under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the
landlord shall return any security deposit and unearned rent to which the tenant
is entitled under Section 59 of this Act.
SECTION 29. KRS 383.605 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "normal wear and tear"
(a) Means deterioration that results from the intended use of a dwelling unit,
including breakage or malfunction due to age or deteriorated condition;
and
(b) Does not include deterioration that results from negligence, carelessness,
Page 29 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
accident, or abuse of the unit, fixtures, equipment, or other tangible
personal property by the tenant, immediate family member, or guest.
(2) A tenant:
(a) Shall comply with the obligations imposed on the tenant by the lease and
Sections 1 to 61 of this Act;
(b) Shall comply with the obligations imposed on a tenant by any building,
housing, fire, or health code or other law;
(c) Except with respect to duties imposed on the landlord by the lease, Sections
1 to 61 of this Act, or other law, shall keep the dwelling unit reasonably safe
and sanitary;
(d) Shall remove all garbage, rubbish, and other debris from the unit in a clean
and safe manner;
(e) Shall keep all plumbing fixtures in the unit reasonably clean;
(f) Shall use in a reasonable manner all electrical, plumbing, heating,
ventilating, and air-conditioning systems and other facilities and appliances
on the premises;
(g) Without the landlord’s consent, shall not intentionally or negligently:
1. Destroy, deface, damage, impair, remove, or render inoperative any
part of the premises;
2. Destroy, deface, damage, impair, remove, or render inoperative any
safety equipment on the premises; or
3. Permit an immediate family member or guest to do any of the acts
specified in this paragraph;
(h) Shall not disturb the use and enjoyment of the premises by another tenant
or permit an immediate family member or guest to do the same;
(i) Shall not engage in or permit an immediate family member or guest to
engage in criminal activity;
Page 30 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(j) Shall notify the landlord within a reasonable time of any condition of the
premises which requires repair by the landlord under the lease or Section
16 of this Act;
(k) Shall return the dwelling unit to the landlord at the termination of the lease
in the same condition as it was at the commencement of the term of the
lease, with the premises free of any damage caused by the tenant, immediate
family member, or guest, except for:
1. Normal wear and tear;
2. Damage resulting from a cause beyond the control of the tenant,
immediate family member, or guest; and
3. Any addition and improvement installed on the premises with the
landlord’s consent; and
(l) Unless the landlord and tenant otherwise agree, shall use the dwelling unit
only for residential purposes.
SECTION 30. KRS 383.660 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act and
subject to subsection (2) of this section:
(a) A landlord may terminate a lease for nonpayment of rent when the rent is
unpaid when due by giving the tenant notice in a record stating that if the
rent remains unpaid fourteen (14) days after the notice is given, the lease
shall terminate on expiration of the fourteen (14) day period or a later
specified date; or
(b) If there is a material noncompliance with a lease or Sections 1 to 61 of this
Act by the tenant, other than nonpayment of rent, the landlord may give the
tenant notice in a record specifying the act or omission constituting the
noncompliance and stating that if the noncompliance is not remedied not
Page 31 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
later than fourteen (14) days after the landlord gives the notice, the lease
shall terminate on a specified date which must be at least thirty (30) days
after the landlord gives the notice.
(2) A landlord may terminate the lease without giving the tenant an opportunity to
remedy a noncompliance by giving the tenant the notice described in subsection
(3) of this section if:
(a) The tenant failed to pay rent in a timely manner on at least two (2)
occasions within the four (4) month period preceding the notice to terminate
the lease;
(b) The tenant committed substantially the same act or omission for which
notice under subsection (1)(b) of this section was given within six (6)
months preceding the latest noncompliance;
(c) The noncompliance by the tenant, immediate family member, or guest poses
an actual and imminent threat to the health or safety of any individual on
the premises or the landlord or landlord’s agent; or
(d) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, the tenant, immediate family
member, or guest has committed a criminal act.
(3) Notice in a record terminating a lease under subsection (2) of this section must
specify the reason for the termination and state that:
(a) For a termination under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section, the lease
shall terminate on a specified date, which must be at least fourteen (14)
days after the landlord gave the notice; or
(b) For a termination under subsection (2)(c) or (d) of this section, the lease
shall terminate immediately or on a later specified date.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, if a tenant fails to
comply with Section 29 of this Act, the landlord may:
(a) Obtain injunctive relief or specific performance; or
Page 32 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(b) Regardless of whether the lease terminates as a result of the tenant’s
noncompliance, recover actual damages or liquidated damages as provided
by the lease.
(5) A landlord shall not terminate a lease under subsection (2)(d) of this section if
the criminal act was the act of an immediate family member or guest, and the
tenant:
(a) Neither knew nor should have known the act was going to be committed;
and
(b) Took reasonable steps to ensure that there will not be a repeated criminal
act on the premises by the immediate family member or guest.
SECTION 31. KRS 383.675 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, acceptance by a landlord of rent for two
(2) or more successive rental periods with knowledge of noncompliance by the
tenant with the lease or Sections 1 to 61 of this Act or acceptance by the landlord
of the tenant’s performance that varies from the terms of the lease or Sections 1
to 61 of this Act is a waiver of the landlord’s right to terminate the lease for the
noncompliance, unless the landlord and tenant otherwise agree after the
noncompliance occurs.
(2) This section does not prevent a landlord or tenant from exercising a right under
Section 37 of this Act to terminate a periodic tenancy.
SECTION 32. KRS 383.680 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Distraint for rent is abolished.
(2) A landlord shall not create, perfect, or enforce a lien or security interest on a
tenant’s tangible personal property to secure the tenant’s performance under the
lease or Sections 1 to 61 of this Act. This subsection does not apply to a lien or
Page 33 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
security interest created or perfected before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 33. KRS 383.670 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "reasonable efforts" means any step a landlord would
take to rent a dwelling unit if the unit is vacated at the end of a term, including
showing the unit to a prospective tenant or advertising the availability of the unit.
(2) A tenant abandons a dwelling unit if:
(a) The tenant delivers possession of the unit to the landlord before the end of
the term by returning the keys or other means of access or otherwise notifies
the landlord the unit has been vacated; or
(b) Rent that is due was not paid for at least five (5) days and the tenant has:
1. Vacated the unit by removing substantially all of the tenant’s personal
property from the unit and the premises; and
2. Caused the termination of an essential service or otherwise indicated
by words or conduct that the tenant has no intention to return to the
unit.
(3) If a tenant abandons the dwelling unit before the end of the term of the lease, the
landlord may recover possession of the unit without a court order and may:
(a) Accept the tenant’s abandonment of the unit by notice in a record given to
the tenant, in which case:
1. The lease terminates on the date of abandonment;
2. The landlord and tenant are liable to each other under the lease only
for a noncompliance with the lease or Sections 1 to 61 of this Act
which occurred before the lease terminates; and
3. The landlord shall return any security deposit and unearned rent to
which the tenant is entitled under Section 59 of this Act; or
(b) Treat the abandonment as wrongful.
Page 34 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(4) If a landlord treats abandonment of a dwelling unit as wrongful under subsection
(3)(b) of this section, the tenant remains liable under the lease and the landlord
has a duty to mitigate by making a reasonable effort to rent the unit, subject to
the following rules:
(a) The landlord’s duty to mitigate does not take priority over the landlord’s
right to lease first any other dwelling unit the landlord has available to
lease;
(b) If the landlord leases the abandoned unit to another person for a term
beginning before the expiration of the term of the lease of the abandoning
tenant, the lease terminates as of the date of the new tenancy and the
landlord may recover actual damages from the abandoning tenant;
(c) If the landlord makes a reasonable effort to lease the abandoning tenant’s
unit but is unable to lease it or is able to lease it only for an amount less
than the rent payable by the abandoning tenant, the landlord may recover
actual damages from the abandoning tenant;
(d) If the landlord fails to make a reasonable effort to lease the abandoning
tenant’s unit, the lease terminates as of the date of abandonment, and the
landlord and tenant are liable to each other under the lease or Sections 1 to
61 of this Act only for a noncompliance with the lease or Sections 1 to 61 of
this Act which occurred before the date of abandonment; and
(e) After deducting the landlord’s actual damages, the landlord shall return
any security deposit and unearned rent to which the tenant is entitled under
Section 59 of this Act.
SECTION 34. KRS 383.690 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Except as otherwise provided in Section 33 of this Act, a landlord:
(1) Shall not recover or take possession of a dwelling unit by an act of self-help,
Page 35 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
including willful interruption or causing the willful interruption of an essential
service to the unit; and
(2) May recover possession of a dwelling unit following termination of a lease only
through an action permitted by law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act.
SECTION 35. KRS 383.615 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a landlord shall not enter a dwelling
unit unless:
(a) Entry is permitted by the lease or the tenant otherwise agrees;
(b) Entry is under a court order;
(c) The tenant has abandoned the unit under Section 33 of this Act; or
(d) Permitted by law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act.
(2) A tenant shall not unreasonably withhold consent for the landlord to enter the
dwelling unit to:
(a) Inspect the unit;
(b) Make a necessary or agreed-to repair, alteration, or improvement;
(c) Supply a necessary or agreed-to service; or
(d) Exhibit the unit to a prospective or actual purchaser, mortgagee, tenant,
worker, or contractor or a public official responsible for enforcing a
building, housing, fire, or health code or other law.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) or (5) of this section, a landlord
may enter a dwelling unit only at a reasonable time and with the tenant’s consent
and shall give the tenant at least twenty-four (24) hours' notice of the intent to
enter the unit.
(4) For routine maintenance or pest control, a landlord may enter the dwelling unit
without the tenant’s consent if the landlord gives the tenant:
(a) At least seventy-two (72) hours' notice of the intent to enter the unit; or
Page 36 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(b) A fixed schedule for maintenance or pest control at least seventy-two (72)
hours before the first scheduled entry into the unit.
(5) In an emergency or when maintenance or repairs are being made at a tenant’s
request, the landlord may enter the dwelling unit without the tenant’s consent if
the landlord gives notice that is reasonable under the circumstances. If the
landlord enters the unit when the tenant is not present and notice was not given,
the landlord shall leave notice of the entry in a conspicuous place in the unit
stating the fact of entry, the date and time of entry, and the reason for the entry.
(6) When notice is given under this section before the landlord enters the unit, the
notice must state the intended purpose for the entry and the date and a
reasonable period during which the landlord anticipates making the entry.
(7) A landlord shall not abuse the right under this section to enter a tenant’s
dwelling unit or use the right to harass the tenant.
SECTION 36. KRS 383.700 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a tenant unreasonably refuses to allow the landlord access to the dwelling unit,
the landlord may recover actual damages or one (1) month’s periodic rent,
whichever is greater, and:
(a) The court may compel the tenant to grant the landlord access to the unit; or
(b) The landlord may terminate the lease by giving the tenant notice in a record
stating that if the tenant fails to grant the landlord access to the unit not
later than fourteen (14) days after the notice, the lease shall terminate on
expiration of the fourteen (14) day period or on a later specified date.
(2) If a landlord unlawfully enters a tenant’s dwelling unit, lawfully enters but in an
unreasonable manner, or makes repeated demands to enter that are otherwise
lawful but have the effect of harassing the tenant, the tenant may recover actual
damages or one (1) month’s periodic rent, whichever is greater, and may:
Page 37 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(a) Seek injunctive relief to prevent the recurrence of the conduct; or
(b) Terminate the lease by giving the landlord notice in a record that the lease
shall terminate immediately or on a later specified date which is not later
than thirty (30) days after notice is given.
SECTION 37. KRS 383.695 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A periodic tenancy continues until the landlord or tenant gives the other the
notice under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, a landlord or tenant
may terminate a periodic tenancy:
(a) For week-to-week, by giving the other at least five (5) days' notice in a
record of the party’s intent to terminate the tenancy on a specified date; and
(b) For month-to-month, by giving the other at least one (1) month's notice in a
record of the party’s intent to terminate the tenancy at the end of the
monthly period.
SECTION 38. KRS 383.685 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section and subsection
(1)(b)2. of Section 24 of this Act, if a tenant remains in possession without the
landlord’s consent after expiration of a tenancy for a fixed term or termination of
a periodic tenancy, the landlord may bring an action for possession. If the
tenant’s holdover is willful, the landlord may recover three (3) times the periodic
rent or three (3) times the actual damages, whichever is greater.
(2) Unless a landlord and tenant otherwise agree in a record, if the tenant remains in
possession with the landlord’s consent after expiration of a tenancy for a fixed
term, a periodic tenancy for month-to-month arises under the same terms as the
expired lease.
Page 38 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
SECTION 39. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a sole tenant under a lease dies before the end of a tenancy for a fixed term or
a periodic tenancy, the tenant’s surviving spouse, partner in a civil union, or
domestic partner who resides in the dwelling unit may assume the lease by giving
the landlord notice in a record not later than twenty (20) days after the tenant’s
death stating the intent of the spouse or partner to assume the lease. On assuming
the lease, the spouse or partner becomes the tenant under the lease.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section or law other than Sections 1 to 61 of
this Act, a landlord or tenant representative may terminate the lease of a deceased
tenant by giving to the other and to a surviving spouse, partner in a civil union,
or domestic partner of the tenant who resides in the dwelling unit notice in a
record. The notice must state the lease shall terminate on a specified date, which
must be at least thirty (30) days after the notice in the case of a tenancy for a
fixed term or a specified date consistent with subsection (2) of Section 37 of this
Act in the case of a periodic tenancy. Notice sent to a surviving spouse or partner
must also state that the surviving spouse or partner has twenty (20) days after
receipt of the notice to assume the lease. If the surviving spouse or partner
assumes the lease, the spouse or partner becomes the tenant under the lease.
(3) If a deceased tenant is survived by a spouse, partner in a civil union, or domestic
partner who resides in the dwelling unit, notice to terminate a lease under
subsection (2) of this section shall not be given before the time specified in
subsection (1) of this section expires.
(4) If a landlord is unable to contact a deceased tenant’s surviving spouse, partner in
a civil union, or domestic partner who resides in the dwelling unit or tenant
representative for the purpose of terminating the lease under subsection (2) of
this section, the landlord may terminate the lease without notice if rent that was
Page 39 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
due was not paid for at least twenty-five (25) days.
SECTION 40. KRS 383.705 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A landlord shall not engage in conduct described in subsection (2) of this section
if the landlord’s purpose is to retaliate against a tenant who:
(a) Complained to a governmental agency responsible for enforcement of a
building, housing, fire, or health code or other law, alleging a violation
applicable to the premises materially affecting the health or safety of the
tenant or immediate family member;
(b) Complained to a governmental agency responsible for enforcement of laws
prohibiting discrimination in rental housing;
(c) Complained to the landlord of noncompliance with the lease or Section 16
of this Act;
(d) Organized or became a member of a tenant’s union or similar organization;
(e) Exercised or attempted to exercise a right or remedy under the lease,
Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, or law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act; or
(f) Pursued an action or administrative remedy against the landlord or testified
against the landlord in court or an administrative proceeding.
(2) Actions that may constitute retaliatory conduct under subsection (1) of this
section include doing or threatening to do any of the following:
(a) Increasing the rent or fees;
(b) Decreasing services, increasing the tenant’s obligations, imposing different
rules on, or selectively enforcing the landlord’s rules against, the tenant or
immediate family member, or otherwise materially altering the terms of the
lease;
(c) Bringing an action for possession on a ground other than nonpayment of
rent;
Page 40 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(d) Refusing to renew a tenancy for a fixed term under a lease containing a
renewal option that is exercisable by the tenant without negotiation with the
landlord, for any period after the lease would otherwise terminate;
(e) Terminating a periodic tenancy; or
(f) Committing a criminal act against the tenant, immediate family member, or
guest.
(3) A landlord is not liable for retaliation under this section if:
(a) The violation of which the tenant complained under subsection (1)(a) or (b)
of this section was caused primarily by the tenant, immediate family
member, or guest;
(b) The tenant’s conduct described in subsection (1) of this section was in an
unreasonable manner or at an unreasonable time or was repeated in a
manner harassing the landlord;
(c) The tenant was in default in the payment of rent at the time notice of the
action described in subsection (2)(c) of this section was sent;
(d) The tenant, immediate family member, or guest engaged in conduct that
threatened the health or safety of another tenant on the premises;
(e) The tenant, immediate family member, or guest engaged in a criminal act;
(f) The landlord is seeking to recover possession based on a notice to terminate
the lease and the notice was given to the tenant before the tenant engaged in
conduct described in subsection (1) of this section; or
(g) The landlord is complying or complied with a building, housing, fire, or
health code or other law by making a required repair, alteration,
remodeling, or demolition that effectively deprives the tenant of the use and
enjoyment of the premises.
SECTION 41. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 41 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(1) If a landlord’s purpose for engaging in conduct described in subsection (2) of
Section 40 of this Act is to retaliate against the tenant for conduct described in
subsection (1) of Section 40 of this Act:
(a) The tenant has a defense against an action for possession, may recover
possession, or may terminate the lease; and
(b) The tenant may recover three (3) times the periodic rent or three (3) times
the actual damages, whichever is greater.
(2) If a tenant terminates a lease under subsection (1) of this section, the landlord
shall return any security deposit and unearned rent to which the tenant is entitled
under Section 59 of this Act.
(3) A tenant’s exercise of a right under this section does not release the landlord
from liability under Section 21 of this Act.
SECTION 42. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, evidence that a
tenant engaged in conduct described in subsection (1) of Section 40 of this Act
within six (6) months before the landlord’s alleged retaliatory conduct creates a
rebuttable presumption that the purpose of the landlord’s conduct was retaliation.
(2) A presumption does not arise under subsection (1) of this section if the tenant
engaged in conduct described in subsection (1) of Section 40 of this Act after the
landlord gave the tenant notice of the landlord’s intent to engage in conduct
described in subsection (2)(a) to (e) of Section 40 of this Act.
(3) A landlord may rebut a presumption under subsection (1) of this section by a
preponderance of evidence showing that the landlord had sufficient justification
for engaging in the conduct that created the presumption and would have
engaged in the conduct in the same manner and at the same time whether or not
the tenant engaged in conduct described in subsection (1) of Section 40 of this
Page 42 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
Act.
SECTION 43. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
If a tenant engages in conduct described in subsection (1)(a) or (e) of Section 40 of this
Act knowing there is no factual or legal basis for the conduct, the landlord may recover
actual damages and the court may award the landlord up to three (3) times the periodic
rent.
SECTION 44. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of Sections 44, 45, and 46 of this Act, possession of a dwelling unit
is relinquished to the landlord when:
(a) The tenant vacates the unit at the termination of the tenancy; or
(b) The tenant abandons the unit under Section 33 of this Act.
(2) If personal property remains on the premises after possession of a dwelling unit is
relinquished to the landlord and the landlord and tenant do not agree otherwise
at the time of relinquishment, the landlord shall:
(a) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, give the tenant notice in a record of
the tenant’s right to retrieve the property; and
(b) Leave the property in the unit or store the property on the premises or in
another place of safekeeping and exercise reasonable care in moving or
storing the property.
(3) The notice required by subsection (2)(a) of this section must be posted at the
dwelling unit and:
(a) Sent to any forwarding address the tenant provided to the landlord or an
address provided under Section 8 of this Act or, if no address is provided, to
the address of the unit;
(b) Inform the tenant of the right to contact the landlord to claim the property
Page 43 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
within the period specified in subsection (4) of this section, subject to
payment of the landlord’s inventorying, moving, and storage costs; and
(c) Provide a telephone number, email address, or mailing address at which the
landlord may be contacted.
(4) If a tenant contacts the landlord to claim personal property not later than eight
(8) days after the landlord gives notice under subsection (2)(a) of this section, the
landlord shall permit the tenant to retrieve personal property not later than five
(5) days after the date of contact or within a longer period to which the parties
agree.
(5) A landlord may require the tenant to pay reasonable inventorying, moving, and
storage costs before retrieving personal property under subsection (4) of this
section.
(6) This section does not prohibit a landlord from immediately disposing of
perishable food, hazardous material, garbage, and trash or transferring an
animal to an animal control officer, humane society, or other person willing to
care for the animal.
(7) Unless a landlord and tenant otherwise agree, if the tenant fails to contact the
landlord or retrieve personal property as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, the property is deemed abandoned and:
(a) If a sale is economically feasible, the landlord shall sell the property and,
after deducting the reasonable cost of inventorying, moving, storing, and
disposing of the property, shall treat the proceeds as part of the tenant’s
security deposit; or
(b) If a sale is not economically feasible, the landlord may dispose of the
property in any manner the landlord considers appropriate.
(8) A landlord that complies with this section is not liable to the tenant or another
person for a claim arising from removal of personal property from the premises.
Page 44 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(9) A landlord that recovers possession of a dwelling unit under a court order is not
required to comply with this section. If a landlord that recovers possession under
a court order complies with this section, that landlord is not liable to the tenant or
another person for a claim arising from removal of personal property from the
premises.
SECTION 45. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a landlord knows that a tenant who was the sole occupant of the dwelling unit
has died, the landlord:
(a) Shall notify a tenant representative of the death;
(b) Shall give the representative access to the premises at a reasonable time to
remove any personal property from the unit and other personal property of
the tenant elsewhere on the premises;
(c) May require the representative to prepare and sign an inventory of the
property being removed; and
(d) Shall pay the representative the deceased tenant's security deposit and
unearned rent to which the tenant otherwise would have been entitled under
Section 59 of this Act.
(2) A contact person or heir accepts appointment as a tenant representative by
exercising authority under Sections 1 to 61 of this Act or other assertion or
conduct indicating acceptance.
(3) The authority of a contact person or heir to act under Sections 1 to 61 of this Act
terminates when the person, heir, or landlord knows that a personal
representative has been appointed for the deceased tenant’s estate.
(4) A landlord that complies with this section is not liable to the tenant’s estate or
another person for unearned rent, a security deposit, or a claim arising from
removal of personal property from the premises.
Page 45 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(5) A landlord that willfully violates subsection (1) of this section is liable to the
estate of the deceased tenant for actual damages.
(6) In addition to the rights provided in this section, a tenant representative has the
deceased tenant’s rights and responsibilities under Section 44 of this Act.
SECTION 46. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a landlord knows of the death of a tenant who, at the time of death, was the
sole occupant of the dwelling unit, and the landlord terminates the lease under
subsection (4) of Section 39 of this Act because the landlord is unable to contact a
tenant representative, the landlord:
(a) Shall mail notice to the tenant at the tenant’s last-known address or other
address of the tenant known to the landlord and to any person the tenant
has told the landlord to contact in the case of an emergency stating:
1. The name of the tenant and address of the dwelling unit;
2. The approximate date of the tenant’s death;
3. That, if the personal property on the premises is not claimed within
sixty (60) days after the notice was sent, the property is subject to
disposal by the landlord; and
4. The landlord’s name, telephone number, and mail or email address at
which the landlord may be contacted to claim the property; and
(b) With the exercise of reasonable care, may leave the property in the dwelling
unit or inventory the property and store it on the premises or in another
place of safekeeping.
(2) If a tenant representative is subsequently identified, the representative may
retrieve the deceased tenant’s personal property from the landlord not later than
sixty (60) days after the notice under subsection (1) of this section. The landlord
may require the representative to pay the reasonable inventorying, moving, and
Page 46 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
storage costs before retrieving the property.
(3) If a deceased tenant’s personal property is not retrieved within the time specified
in subsection (2) of this section, the landlord may dispose of the property in
compliance with subsection (7) of Section 44 of this Act.
(4) A landlord that complies with this section is not liable to the tenant’s estate or
another person for a claim arising from removal of personal property from the
premises.
SECTION 47. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 47 to 55 of this Act:
(1) "Attesting third party" means a law enforcement official, licensed health care
professional, victim advocate, or victim services provider;
(2) "Dating violence" has the same meaning as "dating violence and abuse" in KRS
456.010;
(3) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as "domestic violence and abuse" in
KRS 403.720;
(4) "Perpetrator" means an individual who commits an act of domestic violence,
dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault on a tenant or immediate family
member;
(5) "Sexual assault" means conduct prohibited as any degree of rape, sodomy, or
sexual abuse under KRS Chapter 510 or incest under KRS 530.020;
(6) "Stalking" has the same meaning as "stalk" in KRS 508.130;
(7) "Victim advocate" means an individual, whether paid or serving as a volunteer,
who provides services to victims of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or
sexual assault under the auspices or supervision of a victim services provider,
court, or law enforcement or prosecution agency; and
(8) "Victim services provider":
Page 47 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(a) Means a person that assists victims of domestic violence, dating violence,
stalking, or sexual assault; and
(b) Includes a rape crisis center, domestic violence shelter, or faith-based
organization or other organization with a history of work concerning
domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault.
SECTION 48. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, if a victim of an act of domestic violence,
dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault is a tenant or immediate family
member and has a reasonable fear of suffering psychological harm or a further
act of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault if the victim
continues to reside in the dwelling unit, the tenant, without the necessity of the
landlord’s consent, is released from the lease if the tenant gives the landlord a
notice that complies with subsection (2) of this section and:
(a) A copy of a court order that restrains a perpetrator from contact with the
tenant or immediate family member;
(b) Evidence of the conviction or adjudication of a perpetrator for an act of
domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault against the
tenant or immediate family member; or
(c) A verification that complies with Section 50 of this Act.
(2) To be released from a lease under subsection (1) of this section, the tenant must
give the landlord notice in a record which:
(a) States the tenant’s intent to be released from the lease on a date which must
be at least thirty (30) days from the date of the notice or, if the perpetrator is
a cotenant of the dwelling unit, an earlier date;
(b) States facts giving rise to the fear of psychological harm or suffering a
further act of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault
Page 48 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
if the victim continues to reside in the unit; and
(c) Is given to the landlord:
1. Not later than ninety (90) days after an act of domestic violence,
dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault against the tenant or
immediate family member;
2. When a court order exists that restrains a perpetrator from contact
with the tenant or immediate family member because of an act of
domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault; or
3. If the perpetrator was incarcerated, not later than ninety (90) days
after the tenant acquired knowledge that the perpetrator is no longer
incarcerated.
(3) If there is only one (1) individual tenant of the dwelling unit:
(a) A release under subsection (1) of this section terminates the lease on the
date specified in the notice under subsection (2) of this section if the tenant
vacates the dwelling unit on or before that date; and
(b) The tenant is not liable for rent accruing after the lease terminates or other
actual damages resulting from termination of the lease, but the tenant
remains liable to the landlord for rent and other amounts owed to the
landlord before termination of the lease.
(4) If there are multiple individual tenants of the dwelling unit:
(a) The tenant who gave notice under subsection (2) of this section is released
from the lease as of the date specified in the notice if the tenant vacates the
dwelling unit on or before the specified date, but the release of one (1)
tenant under this section does not terminate the lease with respect to other
tenants;
(b) The tenant released from the lease is not liable to the landlord or any other
person for rent accruing after the tenant’s release or actual damages
Page 49 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
resulting from the tenant’s release;
(c) Any other tenant under the lease may recover from the perpetrator actual
damages resulting from the termination; and
(d) The landlord is not required to return to the tenant released from the lease
or a remaining tenant any security deposit or unearned rent to which the
tenant is otherwise entitled under Section 59 of this Act until the lease
terminates with respect to all tenants.
(5) This section does not apply if a tenant seeking the release from the lease is a
perpetrator.
SECTION 49. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
If a tenant is released from a lease under Section 48 of this Act, the landlord:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4)(d) of Section 48 of this Act, shall
return any security deposit and unearned rent to which the tenant is entitled
under Section 59 of this Act after the tenant vacates the dwelling unit;
(2) Shall not assess a fee or penalty against the tenant for exercising a right granted
under Section 48 of this Act; and
(3) Shall not disclose information required to be reported to the landlord under
Section 48 of this Act unless the:
(a) Tenant provides specific, time-limited, and contemporaneous consent to the
disclosure in a record signed by the tenant; or
(b) Information is required to be disclosed by a court order or law other than
Sections 1 to 61 of this Act.
SECTION 50. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A verification given by a tenant under subsection (1)(c) of Section 48 of this Act
shall be under oath and include:
Page 50 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(a) From the tenant:
1. The tenant’s name and the address of the dwelling unit;
2. The approximate dates on which an act of domestic violence, dating
violence, stalking, or sexual assault occurred;
3. The approximate date of the most recent act of domestic violence,
dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault;
4. A statement that because of an act of domestic violence, dating
violence, stalking, or sexual assault, the tenant or immediate family
member has a reasonable fear that the tenant or family member will
suffer psychological harm or a further act of domestic violence, dating
violence, stalking, or sexual assault if the tenant or family member
continues to reside in the unit; and
5. A statement that the representations in the verification are true and
accurate to the best of the tenant’s knowledge and the tenant
understands that the verification could be used as evidence in court;
and
(b) From an attesting third party:
1. The name, business address, and business telephone number of the
party;
2. The capacity in which the party received the information regarding
the act of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual
assault;
3. A statement that the party has read the tenant’s verification and been
advised by the tenant that the tenant or immediate family member is
the victim of an act of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or
sexual assault and has a reasonable fear that the tenant or family
member will suffer psychological harm or a further act of domestic
Page 51 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault if the tenant or
family member continues to reside in the dwelling unit; and
4. A statement that the party, based on the tenant’s verification, believes
the tenant and understands that the verification may be used as the
ground for releasing the tenant from a lease or terminating the
tenant’s interest under the lease.
(2) If a verification given to a landlord by a tenant under subsection (1)(c) of Section
48 of this Act contains a representation of a material fact known by the tenant to
be false, the landlord may recover an amount not to exceed three (3) times the
periodic rent or three (3) times actual damages, whichever is greater.
SECTION 51. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A landlord may recover from a perpetrator actual damages resulting from a
tenant’s exercise of a right under Section 48 of this Act and, if the perpetrator is a
party to the lease who remains in possession of the dwelling unit, hold the
perpetrator liable on the lease for all obligations under the lease or Sections 1 to
61 of this Act.
(2) A perpetrator shall not recover actual damages or other relief resulting from the
exercise of a right by a tenant under Section 48 of this Act or a landlord under
this section.
SECTION 52. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if a tenant or immediate family
member is a victim of an act of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or
sexual assault and the tenant has a reasonable fear that the perpetrator or other
person acting on the perpetrator’s behalf may attempt to gain access to the
dwelling unit, the tenant, without the landlord’s consent, may cause the locks or
Page 52 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
other security devices for the unit to be changed or rekeyed in a professional
manner and shall give a key or other means of access for the new locks or
security devices to the landlord and any other tenant, other than the perpetrator,
that is a party to the lease.
(2) If locks or other security devices are changed or rekeyed under subsection (1) of
this section, the landlord may change or rekey them, at the tenant’s expense, to
ensure compatibility with the landlord’s master key or other means of access or
otherwise accommodate the landlord’s reasonable commercial needs.
(3) If a perpetrator is a party to the lease, locks or other security devices shall not be
changed or rekeyed under subsection (1) of this section unless a court order,
other than an ex parte order, expressly requires that the perpetrator vacate the
dwelling unit or restrains the perpetrator from contact with the tenant or
immediate family member and a copy of the order has been given to the landlord.
(4) A perpetrator shall not recover actual damages or other relief against a landlord
or tenant resulting from the exercise of a right by the landlord or tenant under
this section.
SECTION 53. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) On issuance of a court order requiring a perpetrator to vacate a dwelling unit
because of an act of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual
assault, other than an ex parte order, neither the landlord nor tenant has a duty
to:
(a) Allow the perpetrator access to the unit unless accompanied by a law
enforcement officer; or
(b) Provide the perpetrator with any means of access to the unit.
(2) If a perpetrator is a party to the lease, on issuance of a court order requiring the
perpetrator to vacate the dwelling unit, other than an ex parte order, the
Page 53 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
perpetrator’s interest under the lease terminates, and the landlord and any
remaining tenant may recover from the perpetrator actual damages resulting
from the termination.
(3) Termination of a perpetrator’s interest under a lease under this section does not
terminate the interest of any other tenant under the lease or alter the obligations
of any other tenant under the lease.
(4) A landlord is not required to return to a perpetrator whose interest under the
lease terminates under this section or to any remaining tenant any security
deposit or unearned rent until the lease terminates with respect to all tenants.
SECTION 54. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a landlord has a reasonable belief that a tenant or immediate family member is
the victim of an act of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual
assault and another tenant of the same landlord who resides in the same building
as the tenant is the perpetrator, the landlord may terminate the perpetrator’s
interest in the lease by giving the perpetrator notice in a record that the
perpetrator’s interest will terminate immediately or on a later specified date,
which is not later than thirty (30) days after notice is given. The notice must state
that the landlord has a reasonable belief that the perpetrator has committed an
act of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault and the
approximate date of the act.
(2) Before giving notice to a perpetrator under subsection (1) of this section, the
landlord shall give notice of the landlord’s intent to terminate the perpetrator’s
interest to the tenant who was the victim of the act of domestic violence, dating
violence, stalking, or sexual assault or whose immediate family member was the
victim. This notice may be given by any means reasonably calculated to reach the
tenant, including oral communication, notice in a record, or notice sent to the
Page 54 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
tenant at any other address at which the landlord reasonably believes the tenant
is located.
(3) Failure of a tenant to receive the notice of the landlord’s intent to terminate the
perpetrator’s interest under subsection (2) of this section does not affect the
landlord’s right to terminate under this section or expose the landlord to any
liability.
(4) If a landlord terminates a perpetrator’s interest under a lease under this section,
any other tenant under the lease may recover from the perpetrator actual
damages resulting from the termination.
(5) Termination of a perpetrator’s interest under a lease under this section does not
terminate the interest of any other tenant under the lease or alter the obligations
of any other tenant under the lease.
(6) A landlord is not required to return to a perpetrator whose interest under a lease
is terminated under this section or to any other tenant under the lease any
security deposit or unearned rent until the lease terminates with respect to all
tenants.
(7) In an action between a landlord and tenant involving the right of the landlord to
terminate the tenant’s interest under this section, the landlord must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence that the landlord had a reasonable belief that the
tenant was a perpetrator.
SECTION 55. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "tenant" includes an applicant seeking to enter into a
lease with a landlord.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, a landlord
shall not do or threaten to do any act in subsection (2) of Section 40 of this Act if
the landlord’s purpose for engaging in the conduct is that:
Page 55 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
(a) An act of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault
committed against the tenant or immediate family member resulted in a
violation of the lease or Sections 1 to 61 of this Act by the tenant; or
(b) A complaint of an act of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or
sexual assault committed against the tenant or immediate family member
resulted in a law enforcement or emergency response.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a landlord shall not
refuse or threaten to refuse to rent a dwelling unit if the landlord’s purpose for
the refusal or threat is that a tenant or an immediate family member is or has
been the victim of an act of domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual
assault.
(4) Evidence that any of the events described in subsection (2) or (3) of this section
occurred within six (6) months before the landlord’s conduct creates a
presumption that the purpose of the landlord’s conduct was retaliation. The
landlord may rebut the presumption by a preponderance of evidence showing that
the landlord had sufficient justification for engaging in the conduct described in
subsection (2) or (3) of this section and would have engaged in the conduct in the
same manner and at the same time regardless whether the events described in
subsection (2) or (3) of this section occurred.
(5) A landlord may terminate the lease of a tenant by giving the tenant notice in a
record that the lease will terminate on a date specified in the notice, which must
be at least thirty (30) days after notice is given if:
(a) Without the landlord’s permission, the tenant invited a perpetrator onto the
premises or allowed a perpetrator to occupy the dwelling unit:
1. After the landlord gave the tenant notice in a record to refrain from
inviting the perpetrator onto the premises; or
2. During a time the tenant knows the perpetrator is subject to a no-
Page 56 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
contact court order or a court order barring the perpetrator from the
premises; and
(b) The landlord demonstrates that:
1. There is an actual and imminent threat to the health or safety of any
individual on the premises, the landlord, or the landlord’s agent if the
lease is not terminated; or
2. The perpetrator has damaged the premises.
(6) If a landlord willfully violates subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the tenant or
prospective tenant may recover three (3) times the periodic rent or three (3) times
actual damages, whichever is greater, and:
(a) Terminate the lease;
(b) Defend an action for possession on the ground that the landlord violated
subsection (2) of this section; or
(c) Obtain appropriate injunctive relief.
SECTION 56. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in Sections 56 to 59 of this Act, "bank account" means a checking,
demand, time, savings, passbook, or similar account maintained at a bank.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a landlord
shall not require the tenant to pay or agree to pay a security deposit, prepaid rent,
or any combination thereof, in an amount that exceeds two (2) times the periodic
rent.
(3) The limit established in subsection (2) of this section does not include the first
month’s rent or fees.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, if a
tenant keeps a pet on the premises or is permitted by the lease to make alterations
to the premises, the landlord may require the tenant to pay an additional security
Page 57 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
deposit in an amount commensurate with the additional risk of damage to the
premises.
SECTION 57. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The following rules apply to a landlord’s interest in a security deposit:
(a) The landlord’s interest is limited to a security interest;
(b) Notwithstanding law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, the landlord’s
security interest is effective against and has priority over each creditor of
and transferee from the tenant; and
(c) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a creditor of and transferee from
the landlord can acquire no greater interest in a security deposit than the
interest of the landlord.
(2) The following rules apply to a tenant’s interest in a security deposit:
(a) Notwithstanding law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act, the tenant’s
interest has priority over any right of setoff the bank in which the account is
maintained may have for obligations owed to the bank other than charges
normally associated with the bank’s maintenance of the account;
(b) The tenant’s interest is not adversely affected if the deposit is commingled
with the deposits of other tenants; and
(c) The effect of commingling other than that allowed in paragraph (b) of this
subsection is determined by law other than Sections 1 to 61 of this Act.
(3) Subsection (1)(c) of this section does not abrogate generally applicable rules of
law enabling a transferee of funds to take the funds free of competing claims.
SECTION 58. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) With respect to funds constituting a security deposit, a landlord:
(a) Shall maintain the ability to identify the funds:
Page 58 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
1. By holding the funds in a bank account that is used exclusively for
security deposits, that is maintained with a bank doing business in this
Commonwealth, and the title of which indicates that it contains
security deposits; and
2. By maintaining records that indicate at all times the amount of the
funds attributable to each tenant whose funds are being held in the
account; and
(b) May commingle the funds received from other tenants as security deposits
in the same bank account but shall not commingle other funds, including
the landlord’s personal or business funds, in the account.
(2) If a landlord fails to comply with subsection (1) of this section, the tenant may
recover actual damages or damages equal to one (1) times the periodic rent,
whichever is greater.
(3) A bank in which a landlord deposits funds constituting a security deposit has no
duty to ensure that the landlord properly applies the funds.
(4) Unless a lease provides otherwise, the landlord is not required to deposit a
security deposit into an interest-bearing account or to pay the tenant interest on
the deposit.
SECTION 59. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) After termination of a lease, the tenant is entitled to the amount by which the
security deposit and any unearned rent exceeds the amount the landlord is owed
under the lease or Sections 1 to 61 of this Act.
(2) Not later than thirty (30) days after a lease terminates and the tenant vacates the
premises, the landlord shall determine the amount the landlord believes the
tenant is entitled to under subsection (1) of this section and:
(a) Tender that amount to the tenant or, if the tenant has died, the tenant
Page 59 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
representative;
(b) Send that amount by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to an address
provided by the tenant or, if the tenant has died, the tenant representative
or, in the absence of that address, to the relevant address specified in
Section 8 of this Act; or
(c) Cause a funds transfer in that amount to be made, with the cost of transfer
paid, to a bank account designated by the tenant or, if the tenant has died,
the tenant's representative.
(3) If the amount under subsection (2) of this section is less than the sum of the
tenant’s security deposit and any unearned rent, the landlord shall provide the
tenant or tenant representative, within the period specified under subsection (2)
of this section, a record specifying each item of property damage or other
unfulfilled obligation of the tenant to which the security deposit or unearned rent
was applied and the amount applied to each item.
(4) If the amount to which the tenant is entitled under subsection (1) of this section is
greater than the amount paid to the tenant or tenant representative, the tenant or
tenant representative may recover the difference.
(5) If a landlord fails to comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the court
may award the tenant or tenant's representative, in addition to any amount
recoverable under subsection (4) of this section, two hundred fifty dollars ($250)
or two (2) times the amount recoverable under subsection (4) of this section,
whichever is greater, unless the landlord’s only noncompliance was the failure to
comply with subsection (2)(b) of this section as a result of the inadvertent failure
to pay the cost of postage or transmission or to use the proper address.
(6) If a security deposit and unearned rent held by a landlord are insufficient to
satisfy the tenant’s obligations under the lease and Sections 1 to 61 of this Act,
the landlord may recover from the tenant the amount necessary to satisfy those
Page 60 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
obligations.
SECTION 60. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) When a landlord’s interest in the premises terminates, the landlord shall:
(a) If the lease continues, not later than thirty (30) days after the termination of
the landlord’s interest, transfer to the person succeeding the landlord’s
interest in the premises any security deposit being held by the landlord and
notify the tenant in a record of the successor’s name and address, the
amount transferred, and any claim previously made against the security
deposit; or
(b) If the lease terminates as a result of the termination of the landlord’s
interest, comply with Section 59 of this Act.
(2) If a landlord dies before the termination of the lease, the personal representative
of the landlord’s estate becomes the landlord until the premises are distributed to
the successor. If the premises are distributed to the successor before the
termination of the lease, the security deposit held by the representative must be
transferred to the successor and the representative shall notify the tenant in a
record of the successor’s name and address, the amount transferred to the
successor, and any claim previously made against the security deposit. If the
premises are not distributed to the successor before the termination of the lease,
the representative shall comply with Section 59 of this Act.
(3) If a landlord or personal representative of the landlord’s estate complies with
subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the landlord or the estate has no further
liability with respect to the security deposit.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, a successor to a
landlord’s interest in the premises has all rights and obligations of the landlord
under Sections 1 to 61 of this Act with respect to any security deposit held by the
Page 61 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
predecessor landlord which has not been returned to the tenant, whether or not
the security deposit was transferred or distributed to the successor.
(5) If a landlord’s interest is terminated by foreclosure, the successor’s liability
under subsection (4) of this section is limited to the security deposit received by
the successor.
SECTION 61. KRS 383.715 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED AS A NEW
SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 to 61 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Residential Landlord and
Tenant Act.
Section 62. KRS 383.240 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the return of the inquest the court shall enter a judgment according to the
inquisition, either for:
(a) The plaintiff, in substance, that he or she have restitution of the premises
aforesaid, and recover of the defendants his or her costs in this behalf
expended;[ or for]
(b) The defendants, in substance, that they recover of the plaintiff their costs in
this behalf expended; or[ for]
(c) The plaintiff against some of the defendants, and for the other defendants
against the plaintiff, if some be found guilty and others not guilty.
(2) In addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section, the court
may grant the relief authorized under Section 27 of this Act.
Section 63. The following KRS sections are repealed:
383.300 Protections for person with rental or lease agreement who is protected by
domestic violence order or interpersonal protective order.
383.302 Prohibited inclusion in rental or lease agreement of authority to terminate on
the basis of tenant's request for assistance in emergencies.
383.500 Local governments authorized to adopt provisions of the Uniform Residential
Page 62 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 826
Landlord and Tenant Act in their entirety and without amendment.
383.505 Purposes -- Policies.
383.515 Construction.
383.525 Settlement of disputed claim or right.
383.540 Jurisdiction -- Service of process.
383.580 Security deposits.
383.620 Tenant's use and occupancy.
383.665 Tenant's failure to maintain.
Section 64. This Act shall apply only to a lease made on or after the effective
date of this Act.
Page 63 of 63
XXXX 12/9/2025 9:42 AM Jacketed